Connecticut, session 2026, SB00335.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 47a-4 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026, and
applicable to rental agreements entered into or renewed on or after said date):
(a) A rental agreement shall not provide that the tenant: (1) Agrees to
waive or forfeit rights or remedies under this chapter and sections 47a-
21, 47a-23 to 47a-23b, inclusive, 47a-26 to 47a-26g, inclusive, 47a-35 to
47a-35b, inclusive, 47a-41a, 47a-43 and 47a-46, or under any section of
the general statutes or any municipal ordinance unless such section or
ordinance expressly states that such rights may be waived; (2)
authorizes the landlord to confess judgment on a claim arising out of the
rental agreement; (3) agrees to the exculpation or limitation of any
liability of the landlord arising under law or to indemnify the landlord
for that liability or the costs connected therewith; (4) agrees to waive
[his] such tenant's right to the interest on the security deposit pursuant
to section 47a-21; (5) agrees to permit the landlord to dispossess [him]
such tenant without resort to court order; (6) consents to the distraint of
[his] such tenant's property for rent; (7) agrees to pay the landlord's
attorney's fees in excess of fifteen per cent of any judgment against the

Substitute Senate Bill No. 335
tenant in any action in which money damages are awarded; (8) agrees
to pay a late charge prior to the expiration of the grace period set forth
in section 47a-15a or to pay rent in a reduced amount if such rent is paid
prior to the expiration of such grace period; (9) agrees to pay a late
charge on rent payments made subsequent to such grace period in an
amount exceeding the amounts set forth in section 47a-15a; [or] (10)
agrees to pay a heat or utilities surcharge if heat or utilities is included
in the rental agreement; or (11) agrees to pay for utilities billed to the
tenant if no separate meter is used to measure utilities delivered
exclusively to such tenant's dwelling unit.
(b) A provision prohibited by subsection (a) of this section included
in a rental agreement is unenforceable.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Public Act No. 26-113 2 of 2